Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4636.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256B.056, subdivision 7a, is amended to read: Subd. 7a. Periodic renewal of eligibility. (a) The commissioner shall make an annual redetermination of eligibility based on information contained in the enrollee's case file and other information available to the agency, including but not limited to information accessed through an electronic database, without requiring the enrollee to submit any information when sufficient data is available for the agency to renew eligibility. (b) If the commissioner cannot renew eligibility in accordance with paragraph (a), the commissioner must provide the enrollee with a prepopulated renewal form containing eligibility information available to the agency and permit the enrollee to submit the form with any corrections or additional information to the agency and sign the renewal form via any of the modes of submission specified in section 256B.04, subdivision 18. (c) An enrollee who is terminated for failure to complete the renewal process may subsequently submit the renewal form and required information within four months after the date of termination and have coverage reinstated without a lapse, if otherwise eligible under this chapter. The local agency may close the enrollee's case file if the required information is not submitted within four months of termination. deleted text begin (d) Notwithstanding paragraph (a), a person who is eligible under subdivision 5 shall be subject to a review of the person's income every six months. deleted text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256B.056, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 7b. new text end new text begin Periodic renewal of eligibility; individuals with excess income. new text end new text begin Notwithstanding subdivision 7a, paragraph (a), a person who has excess income but is eligible under subdivision 5 is subject to a review of the person's income every six months. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256B.056, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 7c. new text end new text begin Periodic renewal of eligibility; employed persons with disabilities. new text end new text begin (a) For a person enrolled in medical assistance under section 256B.057, subdivision 9, the commissioner or local agency must provide the enrollee with the renewal form described in subdivision 7a, paragraph (b), at least 60 calendar days before the end of the enrollee's eligibility period. If the commissioner or local agency fails to provide the enrollee with the renewal form 60 calendar days before the end of the enrollee's eligibility period, consistent with Code of Federal Regulations, title 42, sections 435.912(e) and (g)(2), the commissioner and the local agency must not terminate the enrollee until the end of the second month following the month in which the enrollee's eligibility period ended. new text end new text begin (b) For a person enrolled in medical assistance under section 256B.057, subdivision 9, who due to a good cause is unable to respond within the required time frame to the renewal form provided to the enrollee under subdivision 7a, paragraph (b), the commissioner must provide the enrollee an additional 30 calendar days to respond, as permitted under Code of Federal Regulations, title 42, section 435.912(e)(1). new text end new text begin (c) For a person enrolled in medical assistance under section 256B.057, subdivision 9, the commissioner must not terminate the enrollee's medical assistance eligibility until the commissioner has provided the enrollee with a notice of terminated eligibility that includes information on the enrollee's right to appeal the termination under section 256.045. new text end